Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.010

Definitions—Director may prescribe by rule.

(1) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and to any rules adopted pursuant to this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Charging session" means an event starting when a user or a vehicle initiates a refueling event and stops when a user or a vehicle ends a refueling event.

(b) "City" means a first-class city or a code city, as defined in RCW 35A.01.035, with a population of over fifty thousand persons.

(c) "City sealer" means the person duly authorized by a city to enforce and administer the weights and measures program within such city and any duly appointed deputy sealer acting under the instructions and at the direction of the city sealer.

(d) "Clearly marked" means, at a minimum, a sign, sticker, plaque, or any other visible marker that is readable.

(e) "Commodity in package form" means a commodity put up or packaged in any manner in advance of sale in units suitable for either wholesale or retail sale, exclusive, however, of an auxiliary shipping container enclosing packages that individually conform to the requirements of this chapter. An individual item or lot of any commodity not in packaged form, but on which there is marked a selling price based on established price per unit of weight or of measure, shall be construed to be a commodity in package form.

(f) "Common interest community" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 64.90.010.

(g) "Consumer package" or "package of consumer commodity" means a commodity in package form that is customarily produced or distributed for sale through retail sales agencies or instrumentalities for consumption by persons, or used by persons for the purpose of personal care or in the performance of services ordinarily rendered in or about a household or in connection with personal possessions.

(h) "Cord" means the measurement of wood intended for fuel or pulp purposes that is contained in a space of one hundred twenty-eight cubic feet, when the wood is ranked and well stowed.

(i) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(j) "Direct current fast charger" means electric vehicle supply equipment capable of supplying direct current electricity to a vehicle fitted with the appropriate connection to support refueling the vehicle's energy storage battery.

(k) "Director" means the director of the department or duly authorized representative acting under the instructions and at the direction of the director.

(l) "Electric vehicle service provider" means the entity responsible for operating one or more networked or nonnetworked electric vehicle supply equipment. Operating includes, but is not limited to: Sending commands or messages to a networked electric vehicle supply equipment; receiving commands or messages from a networked electric vehicle supply equipment; or providing billing, maintenance, reservations, or other services to a nonnetworked or networked electric vehicle supply equipment. An electric vehicle service provider may designate another entity to act as the electric vehicle service provider for purposes of this chapter. A state agency, an electric utility as defined in RCW 19.405.020, or a municipal corporation as defined in RCW 39.69.010 is considered an electric vehicle service provider when responsible for operating one or more publicly available electric vehicle supply equipment.

(m) "Electric vehicle supply equipment" means the unit controlling the power supply to one or more vehicles during a charging session including, but not limited to, level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment and direct current fast chargers.

(n) "Fish" means any waterbreathing animal, including shellfish, such as, but not limited to, lobster, clam, crab, or other mollusca that is prepared, processed, sold, or intended for sale.

(o) "Installed" means operational and made available for a charging session.

(p) "Kiosk" means a stand-alone physical unit that allows users to pay for and initiate a charging session at one or more electric vehicle supply equipment located at the same site as the kiosk.

(q) "Level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment" means electric vehicle supply equipment capable of supplying 208 to 240 volt alternating current.

(r) "Meat" means and shall include all animal flesh, carcasses, or parts of animals, and shall also include fish, shellfish, game, poultry, and meat food products of every kind and character, whether fresh, frozen, cooked, cured, or processed.

(s) "Net weight" means the weight of a commodity excluding any materials, substances, or items not considered to be part of such commodity. Materials, substances, or items not considered to be part of a commodity shall include, but are not limited to, containers, conveyances, bags, wrappers, packaging materials, labels, individual piece coverings, decorative accompaniments, and coupons.

(t) "Networked electric vehicle supply equipment" means electric vehicle supply equipment capable of receiving and sending commands or messages remotely from an electric vehicle service provider, including electric vehicle supply equipment with secondary systems that provide remote communication capabilities that have been installed.

(u) "Nonconsumer package" or "package of nonconsumer commodity" means a commodity in package form other than a consumer package and particularly a package designed solely for industrial or institutional use or for wholesale distribution only.

(v) "Nonnetworked electric vehicle supply equipment" means electric vehicle supply equipment incapable of receiving and sending commands or messages remotely from an electric vehicle service provider, including electric vehicle supply equipment with remote communication capabilities that have been disabled.

(w) "Official seal of approval" means the seal or certificate issued by the director or city sealer which indicates that a secondary weights and measures standard or a weighing or measuring instrument or device conforms with the specifications, tolerances, and other technical requirements adopted in RCW 19.94.190.

(x) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator, executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, business trust, corporation, association, society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise.

(y) "Poultry" means all fowl, domestic or wild, that is prepared, processed, sold, or intended or offered for sale.

(z) "Publicly available electric vehicle supply equipment" means electric vehicle supply equipment and associated parking space or spaces designated by a property owner or lessee to be available to, and accessible by, the public.

(aa) "Secondary weights and measures standard" means the physical standards that are traceable to the primary standards through comparisons, used by the director, a city sealer, or a service agent that under specified conditions defines or represents a recognized weight or measure during the inspection, adjustment, testing, or systematic standardization of the graduations of any weighing or measuring instrument or device.

(bb) "Service agent" means a person who for hire, award, commission, or any other payment of any kind, installs, tests, inspects, checks, adjusts, repairs, reconditions, or systematically standardizes the graduations of a weighing or measuring instrument or device.

(cc) "Ton" means a unit of two thousand pounds avoirdupois weight.

(dd) "Weighing or measuring instrument or device" means any equipment or apparatus used commercially to establish the size, quantity, capacity, count, extent, area, heaviness, or measurement of quantities, things, produce, or articles for distribution or consumption, that are purchased, offered or submitted for sale, hire, or award on the basis of weight, measure or count, including any accessory attached to or used in connection with a weighing or measuring instrument or device when such accessory is so designed or installed that its operation affects, or may effect, the accuracy or indication of the device. This definition shall be strictly limited to those weighing or measuring instruments or devices governed by Handbook 44 as adopted under RCW 19.94.190.

(ee) "Weight" means net weight as defined in this section.

(ff) "Weights and measures" means the recognized standards or units of measure used to indicate the size, quantity, capacity, count, extent, area, heaviness, or measurement of any consumable commodity.

(2) The director shall prescribe by rule other definitions as may be necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

[ 2021 c 238 s 1; 2019 c 96 s 1; 1995 c 355 s 4; 1992 c 237 s 3; 1969 c 67 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.